ko: 아이리시 워파이프 세트 구성: 액세서리/부품 번들; 백 전용; 벨로우즈(해당하는 경우); 찬터 전용; 드론 전용; 풀 세트(백; 연습용 세트(백 및 찬터); 찬터); 드론; 기타
hr-HR: Konfiguracija kompleta velike irske gajde: Paket dodataka / dijelova; Samo mješina; Mijeh (ako je primjenjivo); Samo prebiraljka; Samo borduni; Cijeli komplet (mješina; Komplet za vježbu (mješina i prebiraljka); prebiraljka); borduni; Ostalo
sv: Konfiguration av irländsk krigspipa: Paket med tillbehör/delar; Endast säck; Bälg (om tillämpligt); Endast melodipipa; Endast borduner; Komplett set (säck; Övningsset (säck och melodipipa); melodipipa); borduner; Annat
sk-SK: Nastavenie súpravy írskych gájd: Balík príslušenstva/dielov; Iba vak; Mechy (ak sa uplatňuje); Iba gajdica; Iba burdonové píšťaly; Úplná súprava (vak; Cvičná súprava (vak a gajdica); gajdica); burdonové píšťaly; Iné
el: Διαμόρφωση σετ ιρλανδικής γκάιντας: Σετ αξεσουάρ/ανταλλακτικών; Μόνο ο ασκός; Φυσερό (αν ισχύει); Μόνο μελωδικός σωλήνας; Μόνο σωλήνες ισοκράτη; Πλήρες σετ (ασκός; Σετ εξάσκησης (ασκός και μελωδικός σωλήνας); μελωδικός σωλήνας); σωλήνες ισοκράτη; Άλλο
ru: Конфигурация комплекта ирландской волынки: Набор аксессуаров / деталей; Только мешок; Мехи (при наличии); Только чантер; Только бурдоны; Полный комплект (мешок; Учебный комплект (мешок и чантер); чантер); бурдоны; Другое
zh-CN: 爱尔兰战笛套装配置: 配件/零件套装; 仅气囊; 风箱（如果适用）; 仅旋律管; 仅和弦管; 全套（气囊; 练习套件（气囊和旋律管）; 旋律管）; 和弦管; 其他
bg-BG: Конфигурация на комплекта ирландска бойна гайда: Комплект аксесоари/части; Само мех; Мях (ако е приложимо); Само гайдуница; Само ручила; Пълен комплект (мех; Комплект за упражнения (мех и гайдуница); гайдуница); ручила; Друго
it: Configurazione del set di cornamuse irlandesi: Bundle di accessori/parti; Solo sacca; Mantice (se applicabile); Solo chanter; Solo bordoni; Set completo (sacca; Set da studio (sacca e chanter); chanter); bordoni; Altro
lt-LT: Airiškų dūdmaišių rinkinio konfigūracija: Priedų / dalių rinkinio pasiūlymas; Tik maišas; Dumplės (jei taikoma); Tik melodinis vamzdelis; Tik burdoniniai vamzdeliai; Pilnas rinkinys (maišas; Praktikos rinkinys (maišas ir melodinis vamzdelis); melodinis vamzdelis); burdoniniai vamzdeliai; Kita
es: Configuración de la gaita irlandesa: Paquete de accesorios/piezas; Solo bolsa; Fuelle (si aplica); Solo puntero; Solo roncones; Set completo (bolsa; Set de práctica (bolsa y puntero); puntero); roncones; Otra
zh-TW: 愛爾蘭戰笛套組配置: 配件/零件套裝; 僅氣囊; 風箱 (如適用); 僅旋律管; 僅和聲管; 全套 (氣囊; 練習套組 (氣囊與旋律管); 旋律管); 和聲管; 其他
nb: Konfigurasjon av irsk krigsrørsett: Tilbehør/delebunt; Kun bag; Belger (hvis aktuelt); Kun melodipipe; Kun bordunpiper; Fullt sett (bag; Øvingssett (bag og melodipipe); melodipipe); bordunpiper; Annet
pt-BR: Conjunto de gaita de foles irlandesa configuração: Pacote de acessórios/peças; Apenas fole (bag); Fole manual (se aplicável); Apenas chanter; Apenas bordões (drones); Conjunto completo (fole; Kit de treino (fole e chanter); chanter); bordões (drones); Outra
fr: Configuration de l’ensemble de cornemuse irlandaise: Lot de pièces/accessoires; Poche uniquement; Soufflet (si applicable); Tuyau mélodique uniquement; Bourdons uniquement; Ensemble complet (poche; Ensemble d’entraînement (poche et tuyau mélodique); tuyau mélodique); bourdons; Autre
pl: Konfiguracja irlandzkiego zestawu warpipe: Zestaw akcesoriów/części; Tylko worek; Miech (jeśli dotyczy); Tylko przebierka; Tylko burdony; Pełny zestaw (worek; Zestaw treningowy (worek i przebierka); przebierka); burdony; Inne
en: Irish warpipe set configuration: Accessories/parts bundle; Bag only; Bellows (if applicable); Chanter only; Drones only; Full set (bag; Practice set (bag & chanter); chanter); drones; Other
tr: İrlanda savaş gaydası set yapılandırması: Aksesuar/parça paketi; Sadece tulum; Körük (varsa); Sadece melodi borusu; Sadece dem ses boruları; Tam set (tulum; Egzersiz seti (tulum ve melodi borusu); melodi borusu); dem ses boruları; Diğer
ro-RO: Configurația setului de cimpoi irlandez: Pachet cu accesorii/piese; Doar burduf; Foale (dacă este cazul); Doar tub melodic; Doar tuburi de ison; Set complet (burduf; Set de studiu (burduf și tub melodic); tub melodic); tuburi de ison; Altele
ja: アイルランドのワープパイプセットの構成: アクセサリー/パーツバンドル; バッグのみ; ふいご（該当する場合）; チャンターのみ; ドローンのみ; フルセット（バッグ; 練習用セット（バッグとチャンター）; チャンター）; ドローン; その他
nl: Irish warpipe set configuratie: Accessoires-/onderdelenbundel; Alleen zak; Blaasbalg (indien van toepassing); Alleen speelpijp; Alleen bourdons; Volledige set (zak; Oefenset (zak & speelpijp); speelpijp); bourdons; Overig
de: Konfiguration des Irish-Warpipe-Sets: Zubehör-/Teile-Bundle; Nur Sack; Blasebalg (falls zutreffend); Nur Spielpfeife; Nur Bordune; Komplettset (Sack; Übungsset (Sack & Spielpfeife); Spielpfeife); Bordune; Sonstige
th: การจัดวางชุดปี่สงครามไอริช: ชุดรวมอุปกรณ์เสริม/อะไหล่; ถุงลมเท่านั้น; ที่สูบลม (ถ้ามี); เลาปี่เท่านั้น; ท่อเสียงประสานเท่านั้น; ครบชุด (ถุงลม; ชุดซ้อม (ถุงลมและเลาปี่); เลาปี่); ท่อเสียงประสาน; อื่นๆ
cs: Konfigurace irských dud: Sada příslušenství/dílů; Pouze vak; Měchy (pokud jsou součástí); Pouze píšťala (chanter); Pouze borduny (drones); Plná sada (vak; Tréninková sada (vak a píšťala); píšťala); borduny; Jiné
pt-PT: Configuração do conjunto de gaitas de guerra irlandesas: Conjunto de acessórios/peças; Apenas saco; Fole (se aplicável); Apenas ponteiro; Apenas roncões; Conjunto completo (saco; Conjunto de prática (saco e ponteiro); ponteiro); roncões; Outro
sl-SI: Konfiguracija kompleta irskih dud: Paket dodatkov/delov; Samo meh; Meh za pihanje (če je na voljo); Samo piščal; Samo brdoni; Celoten komplet (meh; Komplet za vajo (meh in piščal); piščal); brdoni; Drugo
hu: Ír harci duda szett konfigurációja: Tartozék-/alkatrészcsomag; Csak tömlő; Fújtató (ha van); Csak dallamsíp; Csak burdonsípok; Teljes készlet (tömlő; Gyakorlókészlet (tömlő és dallamsíp); síp); burdonsípok; Egyéb
fi: Irlantilaisen säkkipillin kokoonpano: Tarvike-/osapaketti; Vain pussi; Palkeet (tarvittaessa); Vain melodiapilli; Vain bordunapillit; Täysi sarja (pussi; Harjoitussarja (pussi ja melodiapilli); melodiapilli); bordunapillit; Muu
da: Opsætning af irsk warpipe-sæt: Sampak med tilbehør/dele; Kun sæk; Blæsebælg (hvis relevant); Kun spillerør; Kun borduner; Fuldt sæt (sæk; Øvesæt (sæk og spillerør); spillerør); borduner; Andet
vi: Cấu hình bộ kèn túi Ireland: Gói phụ kiện/bộ phận; Chỉ có túi; Ống thổi (nếu có); Chỉ có ống giai điệu; Chỉ có ống trầm; Bộ đầy đủ (túi; Bộ thực hành (túi & ống giai điệu); ống giai điệu); ống trầm; Khác